Utah statutes.
17-19a-208.   Reporting -- State treasurer -- County legislative body.

(1)  On or before the last day of each month, the county auditor shall submit a report to the state treasurer regarding the collection, care, and disbursement of state money by the county during the preceding month.

(2)  The county auditor and the county treasurer shall, as required by the county legislative body, make a joint report to the county executive and the county legislative body accounting for the financial condition of the county.

